fst/morphology/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
! Copyright © 2015–2024 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
! http://altlab.ualberta.ca/
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
! but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
! GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
! along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

! noun_affixes.lexc
! ! ALL OF AEW NI CLASSES GO TO A SINGLE NI LEXICON
! ! ALL OF AEW NA CLASSES GO TO A SINGLE NA LEXICON
! ! ALL OF AEW DEPENDENT NA CLASSES GO TO A SINGLE NAD LEXICON (including kinship)
! ! ALL OF AEW DEPENDENT NI CLASSES GO TO A SINGLE NID LEXICON
! ! i2, i4 (animate dependent only), w3 (animate dependnet nouns only) should be the only special character we need for the noun affixes; -im possesion is done by flag diacritics in the affixes file

! Noun affixes

LEXICON NOUN_PREFIXES
@P.noun.Indep@     NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES ;
@P.noun.DepKin@    NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_PREFIXES ;
@P.noun.DepNonKin@ NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit2%<  PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit2%<  PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@ot2%<     PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.NULL@                    PRENOUNS_GATE ;

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@ni4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@ki4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@w3%<      PRENOUNS_GATE ;

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@ni4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@ki4%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.O@:@P.person.O@w3%<      PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@P.person.MI@0:@P.person.MI@0mi4%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;

LEXICON PRENOUNS_GATE
NOUNSTEMS_GATE ;
PRENOUNS ;

!! Here we continue to lexical prenouns (in prenouns.lexc)
!
! LEXICON PRENOUNS
! PN/prenoun+:prenoun PRENOUNS_BOUND ;
! ...
! Here we return from prenouns

LEXICON PRENOUNS_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@%^EGLOT%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@-%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
! @D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@ NOUN_FRAG ;

@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC%^EGLOT%< PRENOUNS_GATE ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC-%<   PRENOUNS_GATE ;
! @R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@:@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@%^IC NOUN_FRAG ;

LEXICON NOUNSTEMS_GATE
@R.noun.Indep@     NOUN_INDEP_STEMS ;
@R.noun.DepKin@    NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS ;
@R.noun.DepNonKin@ NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Looping through the NOUN stems in the following LEXICONs
!
! LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_STEMS
! asikan NA ;
!
! LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
! nôhkom:ohkom NA ;
!
! LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS
! mitâs:tâs NA ;
!
! End of place-holder noun stems
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! Setting up flag-diacritics based on stem contlexica for possessive -im/0 and diminutive -is/-isis

! NA

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM
@P.theme.IM@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM2
@P.theme.IM2@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/IS
@P.dim.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/ISIS
@P.dim.ISIS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/DIM
@P.dim.DIM@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM@ NA_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM@ NA_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM2@ NA_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM2@ NA_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM
@P.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NA_SG/I_POSS/IM
@P.sg.I@ NA_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NA_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.I@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NA_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.I@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

! NAD

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM
@P.theme.IM@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM2
@P.theme.IM2@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/IS
@P.dim.IS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/ISIS
@P.dim.ISIS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/DIM
@P.dim.DIM@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM@ NAD_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM@ NAD_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM2@ NAD_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM2@ NAD_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/A
@P.sg.A@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/I
@P.sg.I@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/A_POSS/IM
@P.sg.A@ NAD_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/I_POSS/IM
@P.sg.I@ NAD_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.A@ NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.A@ NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.I@ NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.I@ NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

! NI

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM
@P.theme.IM@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM2
@P.theme.IM2@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/IS
@P.dim.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/ISIS
@P.dim.ISIS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/DIM
@P.dim.DIM@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM@ NI_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM@ NI_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM2@ NI_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM2@ NI_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM
@P.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

! NID

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM
@P.theme.IM@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM2
@P.theme.IM2@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/IS
@P.dim.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/ISIS
@P.dim.ISIS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/DIM
@P.dim.DIM@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM@ NID_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM@ NID_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS
@P.theme.IM2@ NID_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS
@P.theme.IM2@ NID_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NID_SG/I
@P.sg.I@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_SG/I_POSS/IM
@P.sg.I@ NID_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NID_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.A@ NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

LEXICON NID_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.sg.I@ NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NID_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.sg.I@ NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

! #####

! LEXICON NI_POSS/IM
! @P.im.IM@ NI ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_DIM/IS
! @P.is.IS@ NI ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_DIM/ISIS
! @P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
! @P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NI ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
! @P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM
! @U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM ;
!
! LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
! @U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
!
! NID
!
! LEXICON NID_POSS/IM
! @P.im.IM@ NID ;
!
! LEXICON NID_DIM/IS
! @P.is.IS@ NID ;
!
! LEXICON NID_DIM/ISIS
! @P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;
!
! LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
! @P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NID ;
! 
! LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
! @P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;
!
! LEXICON NID_SG/I
! @U.sg.I@ NID ;
! 
! LEXICON NID_SG/I_DIM/IS
! @U.sg.I@ NID_DIM/IS ;

!! Starting with the general morphosyntactic features in a standardized order

LEXICON NA
+N+A:0 NA_POSS_GATE1 ;

LEXICON NAD
@P.dep.DEP@+N+A+D:@P.dep.DEP@0 NA_POSS_GATE1 ;

LEXICON NI
+N+I:0 NI_POSS_GATE1 ;

LEXICON NID
@P.dep.DEP@+N+I+D:@P.dep.DEP@0 NI_POSS_GATE1 ;

! LEXICON NI
! +N+I:0 NI_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX ;
! 
! LEXICON NID
! @P.dep.DEP@+N+I+D:@P.dep.DEP@0 NI_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX ;

!! Suffixation for animate nouns

LEXICON NA_POSS_GATE1
@D.person.NULL@ NA_THEME_SUFFIX1 ;
@R.person.NULL@ NA_DIM_GATE ;

LEXICON NA_THEME_SUFFIX1
! Standard forms
@D.theme.IM@0                                                    NA_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM@@C.sg@:@R.theme.IM@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NA_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@:@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                     NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Non-standard forms
@D.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NA_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@0                                         NA_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                                        NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_DIM_GATE
@P.dim.NULL@                          NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dep@+Der/Dim+N+A:@D.dep@           NA_DIM_SUFFIX ;
@R.dep.DEP@+Der/Dim+N+A+D:@R.dep.DEP@ NA_DIM_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON NA_DIM_SUFFIX
! Standard forms
@R.dim.IS@@C.sg@:@R.dim.IS@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs                               NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.ISIS@@C.sg@:@R.dim.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis                         NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dim@@C.sg@:@D.dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs                                     NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dim@@C.sg@:@D.dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis                                   NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
! Non-standard forms
@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs     NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis   NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs   NA_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsis     NA_POSS_GATE2 ;

LEXICON NA_POSS_GATE2
@D.person.NULL@ NA_THEME_SUFFIX2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
